District of Columbia statutes.
31-758

Limitations of actions.

Any action challenging the validity of, or arising out of acts taken or proposed to be taken under, this subchapter shall be commenced within 30 days after the effective date of any plan submitted for approval pursuant to this subchapter.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 9, 45 DCR 1792
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.
1981 Ed., § 35-3748.